Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2103
Business development corporations;
incorporation.

One or more business development corporations
may be incorporated in this state pursuant to the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act not
in conflict with or inconsistent with the provisions of the Nebraska Business
Development Corporation Act.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 3, p. 303;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 204;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 266.
January 1, 2017
Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.